Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 5 UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO HOSPITAL AUTHORITY
23-21-514. Bonds and notes.

The authority has the power and is authorized to issue from time to time its notes and bonds in such principal amounts as the authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of the authority, the establishment of reserves to secure such notes and bonds, and all other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers.

The authority has the power, from time to time, to issue:

Notes to renew notes;

Bonds to pay notes, including the interest thereon, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured; and

Bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its corporate purposes.

Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this paragraph (b) may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded or sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption, or payment of such bonds.

The authority has the power to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its notes and bonds shall be general obligations of the authority payable out of any revenues or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging any particular revenues.

The notes and bonds shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board of directors.

Any resolution authorizing any notes or bonds or any issue thereof may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof, as to:

Pledging all or any part of the revenues of the authority to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

Pledging all or any part of the assets of the authority to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of notes or bonds, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist, such assets to include any grant or contribution from the federal government or any corporation, association, institution, or person;

The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of notes or bonds may be applied and pledging such proceeds to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue thereof;

Limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds, the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other notes or bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with noteholders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of notes or bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Limitations on the amount of moneys to be expended by the authority for operating expenses of the authority;

Vesting in a trustee such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to this part 5, and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee under this part 5 or limiting the rights, powers, and duties of such trustee;

Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the authority to the holders of the notes or bonds and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the notes or bonds in the event of such default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver; except that such rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of this state and the other provisions of this part 5;

Any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way affect the security or protection of the holders of the notes or bonds.

The bonds or notes of each issue may, in the discretion of the board of directors, be made redeemable before maturity at such prices and under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the board of directors. Notes shall mature at such time as may be determined by the board of directors, and bonds shall mature at such time, not exceeding thirty-five years from their date of issue, as may be determined by the board. The bonds may be issued as serial bonds payable in annual installments or as term bonds or as a combination thereof. The notes and bonds shall bear interest at such rate, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment and at such place, and be subject to such terms of redemption as such resolution may provide. The notes and bonds of the authority may be sold by the authority, at public or private sale, at such price as the board of directors shall determine.

In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or notes or coupons attached thereto ceases to be such officer before the delivery thereof, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The board of directors may also provide for the authentication of the bonds or notes by a trustee or fiscal agent.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds or notes, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds or notes until such definitive bonds or notes have been executed and are available for delivery.

The authority, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist, has the power out of any funds available therefor to purchase notes or bonds of the authority, which shall thereupon be canceled at a price not exceeding:

If the notes or bonds are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment thereon; or

If the notes or bonds are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the first date after such purchase upon which the notes or bonds become subject to redemption plus accrued interest to such date.

In the discretion of the authority, the bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the power of a trust company within or without this state. Such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. The authority may provide by such trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and the revenues to the trustee under such trust indenture or other depository and for the method of disbursement thereof, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of the authority. If the bonds are secured by a trust indenture, the bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

The authority shall not have outstanding, at any one time, bonds, not including bond anticipation notes, or bonds which have been refunded, in an aggregate principal amount exceeding sixty million dollars; however, this limitation shall not apply to bonds which are unsecured or secured solely by a pledge of the revenues of the authority and are not in any way secured by a pledge of any of the authority's other assets, including, without limitation, any buildings or real property, and which contain a statement that the bondholders shall not have any recourse against the authority's other assets for repayment of the bonds. Under no circumstances shall the regents or the state of Colorado be liable for any indebtedness incurred by the authority. The general assembly specifically finds there is a substantial public purpose in limiting the indebtedness of the authority in the event the authority assets or the hospital assets are transferred back to or revert to the regents.

The authority has the power and is authorized to issue from time to time notes, bonds, and other securities which may be collateralized or otherwise secured in whole or in part by loans or participations or other interests in such loans or which may evidence loans or participations or other interests in such loans to provide net funds that are to be dedicated in whole or in part by resolution of the authority to the carrying out of one or more of the purposes of the authority. The interest on or from such notes, bonds, and other securities may be subject to or exempt from federal income taxation.

Any notes, bonds, or other securities issued pursuant to this section, and the income therefrom, including any profit from the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any agency, political subdivision, or instrumentality of the state.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 570, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-515. Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this part 5, or any coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, except to the extent the rights under this part 5 may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted under this part 5 or under such agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the authority pursuant to this part 5, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this part 5 or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the authority or by an officer thereof.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 574, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-516. Negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this part 5 or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this part 5, all such bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto shall be negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to any applicable provisions for registration.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 574, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-517. Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this part 5 are hereby made securities in which all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in such bonds only if said bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the state is authorized by law.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 574, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-518. Refunding bonds.

The board of directors may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations of the authority for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which have been issued under the provisions of this part 5, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such obligations, and for any corporate purpose of the authority.

Refunding obligations issued as provided in subsection (1) of this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this part 5, and, if sold, the proceeds thereof may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of such outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of any such refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, the accrued interest, and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing the same, to the payment of any interest on such refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with such refunding, such proceeds may be invested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., which shall mature or which shall be subject to redemption by the holders thereof, at the option of such holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 575, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-519. Nonliability of state for bonds.

Neither the state of Colorado nor the regents shall be liable for bonds of the authority, and such bonds shall not constitute a debt of the state or of the regents. The bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to such effect.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 575, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-520. Members of authority not personally liable on bonds.

Neither the members of the board of directors nor any authorized person executing bonds issued pursuant to this part 5 shall be personally liable for such bonds by reason of the execution or issuance thereof.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 576, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-521. Annual report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the authority shall submit to the governor and the joint budget committee within six months after the end of the fiscal year a report which shall set forth a complete and detailed operating and financial statement of the authority during such year. Also included in the report shall be any recommendations with reference to additional legislation or other action that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 576, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 852, § 12, effective May 24.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1251), ch. 253, p. 1060, § 11, effective August 9.

23-21-522. Powers of the authority - investments.

The authority has the power:

To invest any funds not required for immediate disbursement in property or in securities which meet the standard for investments established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S., provided such investment assists the authority in carrying out its public purposes; and to sell from time to time such securities thus purchased and held; and to deposit any securities in any trust bank within or without the state. Any funds deposited in a banking institution or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., shall be secured in such manner and subject to such terms and conditions as the board may determine, with or without payment of any interest on such deposit, including, without limitation, time deposits evidenced by certificates of deposit. Any commercial bank incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as depository of any funds of the authority may issue indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as may be required by the board of directors.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), to contract with the holders of any of its notes or bonds as to the custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any moneys of the authority and of any moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of notes or bonds and to carry out such contract. Moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of notes or bonds or in any way to secure notes or bonds and deposits of such moneys may be secured in the same manner as moneys of the authority, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 576, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-523. Agreement of this state.

This state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any notes or bonds issued under this part 5 that this state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the said holders thereof or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such notes and bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of this state in any agreement with the holders of such notes or bonds.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 577, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-524. This part 5 not a limitation of powers.

Nothing in this part 5 shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any other powers which the authority might otherwise have under any other law of this state, and this part 5 is cumulative to any such powers. This part 5 does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. However, the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations and refunding bonds under the provisions of this part 5 need not comply with the requirements of any other state law applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations. No proceedings, notice, or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds, notes, or other obligations or any instrument as security therefor, except as is provided in this part 5.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 577, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-525. Exemption from property taxation.

The authority shall be exempt from any general ad valorem taxes upon any property of the authority acquired and used for its public purposes. The authority may enter into agreements to pay annual sums in lieu of taxes to any county, municipality, or other taxing entity with respect to any real property which is owned by the authority and is located in such county, municipality, or other taxing entity.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 577, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-526. Psychiatric hospital.

The university of Colorado psychiatric hospital established under article 22 of this title shall remain the integrated psychiatric service for university hospital, and the department of public health and environment shall issue a single license for the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital and university hospital.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 577, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2739, § 371, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

23-21-527. General assembly retains authority to enact laws governing university hospital.

The general assembly expressly reserves its plenary legislative authority relating to the university of Colorado university hospital, including but not limited to the authority to enact laws relating thereto. Nothing in this part 5 or part 6 of this article or in section 11 of article II of the state constitution or in section 10 of article I of the federal constitution, relating to impairment of the obligation of contract, shall be construed to limit said legislative authority. Any contract or other obligation of the authority is expressly subject to the provisions of this section, and the parties to such contract or obligation shall not assert such contract or obligation as a bar to the general assembly's exercise of legislative authority relating to the university of Colorado university hospital.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 578, § 2, effective June 1.

23-21-528. Severability.

Any provision of this part 5 declared to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid shall not impair the remaining provisions of this part 5 or the provisions of part 6 of this article. Any provision of part 6 of this article declared to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid shall not impair the provisions of this part 5 or the remaining provisions of said part 6.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 578, § 2, effective June 1.